Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB541.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1333(b.1) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1333. Lost, stolen, damaged or illegible registration plate.* * *(b.1) Illegible registration plate.--* * *(3) An individual employed as a staff person in a district office of a member of the Senate or House of Representatives of the Commonwealth shall be an authorized representative of the department for purposes of paragraph (1) if the individual has completed a training program, approved by the department, for making the determination <--1234567891011121314151617 required by paragraph (1).(3) THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUALS SHALL BE AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPARTMENT FOR PURPOSES OF PARAGRAPH (1) IF THE INDIVIDUAL HAS COMPLETED A TRAINING PROGRAM, APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT, FOR MAKING THE DETERMINATION REQUIRED BY PARAGRAPH (1):(I) AN INDIVIDUAL EMPLOYED AS A STAFF PERSON IN A DISTRICT OFFICE OF A MEMBER OF THE SENATE OR HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE COMMONWEALTH.(II) AN INDIVIDUAL EMPLOYED BY A MESSENGER SERVICE OPERATING UNDER CONTRACT AS REQUIRED BY SECTION 7501 (RELATING TO AUTHORIZATION OF MESSENGER AND AGENT SERVICES).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0541PN1282 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415